apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="beg/in__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inning</l>    <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/old__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olds</l>      <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eld</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eld</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olding</l>    <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ben/d__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ds</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ding</l>      <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cut__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ook</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aken</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>aked</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>aked</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inds</l>      <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ound</l>      <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ound</l>      <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inding</l>    <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/ite__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ites</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itten</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iting</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ble/ed__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eds</l>       <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eding</l>     <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bl/ow__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ows</l>       <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>own</l>       <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="b/uy__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uys</l>       <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uying</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ca/tch__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>tch</l>       <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tch</l>       <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tches</l>     <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ught</l>      <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ught</l>      <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tching</l>    <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>       <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>       <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oses</l>      <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osing</l>     <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="control__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>led</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>led</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ling</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bite">            <i>b</i><par n="b/ite__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bind">            <i>b</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="buy">             <i>b</i><par n="b/uy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begin">           <i>beg</i><par n="beg/in__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bend">            <i>ben</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bet">             <i>bet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blow">            <i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bleed">           <i>ble</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bring">           <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="breed">           <i>bre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="build">           <i>buil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="catch">           <i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="choose">          <i>cho</i><par n="cho/ose__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cling">           <i>cl</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="control">         <i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cut">             <i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dial">            <i>dial</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distil">          <i>distil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enrol">           <i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="find">            <i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feed">            <i>fe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fulfil">          <i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grow">            <i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hold">            <i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hit">             <i>hit</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="know">            <i>kn</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kneel">           <i>kneel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lend">            <i>len</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="let">             <i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="level">           <i>level</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="output">          <i>output</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="propel">          <i>propel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="put">             <i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="put together">    <i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>together</l><r><g><b/>together</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="quarrel">         <i>quarrel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repel">           <i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reset">           <i>reset</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="send in">         <i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="send">            <i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="set">             <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shake">           <i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shut">            <i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speed">           <i>spe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spend">           <i>spen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="split">           <i>split</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swing">           <i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="take care">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>care</l><r><g><b/>care</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take part">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>part</l><r><g><b/>part</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take advantage of"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take place">      <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>place</l><r><g><b/>place</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take control of">  <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>control<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>control<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take">            <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="throw">           <i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="travel">          <i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undertake">       <i>undert</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uphold">          <i>uph</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="upset">           <i>upset</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="withhold">        <i>withh</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/></e>
